Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The  Department of Human Services shall review the statutes and ad-
ministrative rules  of this state to identify all instances of background checks of subject in-
dividuals under ORS 181A.200, 326.604, 329A.030, 342.125, 342.143,  409.027, 413.036, 418.016,
420A.021, 443.004 and 443.735, similarities and differences in the background  checks, and
options to consolidate and reduce  the number of different background checks for similar
purposes or programs.
(2) In conducting the  review under this section, the department shall consult the HB
4091: Workgroup Report: Recommendations Regarding  Criminal Records Verification in
Oregon, published by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services in November 2012.
(3) The department  shall submit a report on the review under this section in the manner
provided by ORS 192.245,  and may include recommendations for legislation, to the interim
committees of the  Legislative Assembly related to human services no later than September
15, 2026.
SECTION 2. The Department of Human Services shall study options for providing that a
person does not need to undergo another background check conducted by a  state agency for
the purposes of working with children, elderly persons or persons with disabilities if the
person has already passed a background check conducted by a state agency in the previous
12 months. The department shall submit a report in the manner provided by ORS  192.245,
and may include recommendations for legislation, to  the interim committees of the Legisla-
tive Assembly related to human services no later than June 30, 2026.
SECTION 3.
Sections 1 and 2 of this 2025 Act are repealed on January 2, 2027.
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled House Bill 3224 (HB 3224-A) Page 1
Passed by House April 14, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 3, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3224 (HB 3224-A) Page 2